Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 382 Conveyances and Encumbrances

382.010.
Estate — Owner may convey — When deed or will necessary.

The owner may convey any interest in real property not in the adverse possession of another; but no estate of inheritance or freehold, or for a term of more than one (1) year, in real property shall be conveyed, except by deed or will.

History.

490.

382.020.
Deeds of release.

Every deed of release shall be executed as deeds are executed and shall be as effectual for the purposes therein expressed, without the execution of a lease, as if a lease had been executed.

History.

492, 498.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Baker and Baker, Title Examination in Kentucky, 48 Ky. Bench & B. 12 (1984).

Kentucky Law Journal.

Whiteside, Lewis, Kentucky’s Commercial Code — Some Initial Problems in Security, 50 Ky. L.J. 61 (1961).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Receipts and Releases, § 198.00.

382.030.
General warranty — Words that constitute.

A covenant by a grantor in a deed, “that he will warrant the property hereby conveyed,” or words of like import, or the words “with warranty,” or “with general warranty,” in any deed, have the same effect as if the grantor had covenanted that he, his heirs and personal representatives, would forever warrant and defend the property unto the grantee, his heirs, personal representatives and assigns, against the claims and demands of all persons whatever.

History.

493.

382.040.
Special warranty — Words that constitute.

A covenant by a grantor, “that he will warrant specially the property thereby conveyed,” or words of like import, or the words “with special warranty,” in any deed, have the same effect as if the grantor had covenanted that he, his heirs and personal representatives, would forever warrant and defend the property unto the grantee, his heirs, personal representatives and assigns, against the claims and demands of the grantor and all persons claiming by, through, or under him.

History.

493.

382.050.
Married women — Conveyance of real property. [Repealed.]

382.060.
Conveyance to dead person vests title in his heirs.

When a patent is issued or a deed is made to a person who is dead at the issuing of the patent or the making of the deed, the heirs of such patentee or vendee shall take, hold and enjoy the title to the estate so patented or conveyed as if such patent had issued or deed had been made to such heirs by name.

History.

2063.

382.070.
No lien unless unpaid consideration stated.

When any real property is conveyed, and any part of the consideration remains unpaid, the grantor shall not have a lien for the unpaid consideration against bona fide creditors and purchasers unless the deed states what part of the consideration remains unpaid.

History.

2358.

382.075.
Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act — Recording of electronic document — Electronic signature — Powers and duties of county clerk.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording by the county clerk upon the records relating to real property, that a document be an original, be on paper or another tangible medium, or be in writing, the requirement shall be satisfied by an electronic document that complies with the requirements of KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be signed, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic signature.

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal need not accompany an electronic signature.

As used in this section, “paper document” means a document that is received by the clerk in a form that is not electronic. A clerk:

May receive, index, store, archive, and transmit electronic documents;

May provide for access to, and search and retrieval of, documents and information by electronic means;

Who accepts electronic documents for recording shall continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state law and shall place entries for both types of documents in the same index;

May convert paper documents accepted for recording into electronic form;

May convert into electronic form information recorded before the clerk began to record electronic documents;

May accept electronically any fee, levy, or tax that the clerk is authorized to collect; and

May agree with other officials of a state or a political subdivision of that state, or of the United States, on procedures or processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of fees, levies, and taxes that the clerk is authorized to accept.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.” In applying and construing this section, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 33, effective January 1, 2020.

382.076.
Paper copy of electronic record relating to real property — Certificate — Notice — Exception for plats, maps, and surveys.

If a law requires that an instrument relating to real property within the Commonwealth, to be admitted to the public record and recorded, to an original, be on paper or another tangible medium, be in writing, or be signed, the requirement shall be satisfied by a paper copy of an electronic record, including an electronic record bearing an electronic signature, that a notary public has certified, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, to be a true and correct copy of the record that was originally in electronic form and bearing an electronic signature.

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied by a paper copy of an electronic document bearing an electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, that a notary public has certified, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, to be a true and correct copy of a document that was originally in electronic form and bearing an electronic signature of the person. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal need not accompany an electronic signature.

A county clerk shall record a paper copy of a document that was originally in electronic form and that is otherwise entitled to be recorded under the laws of this state, if the paper copy has been certified to be a true and correct copy of the electronic record by a notary public as evidenced by a certificate attached to or made a part of the record. The certificate:

Shall:

Be signed and dated by the notary public;

Identify the jurisdiction in which the certification is performed;

Contain the title of the notary public; and

Indicate the number and date of expiration, if any, of the notary public’s commission; and

May include an official stamp of the notary public affixed to or embossed on the certificate.

The following form of certificate is sufficient for the purposes of this section, if completed with the information required by subsection (3) of this section:

A notary public duly commissioned under the laws of this Commonwealth or of another state within the United States has the authority to make the certification provided in this section.

A notary public making the certification provided in this section shall:

Personally print or supervise the printing of the electronic document onto paper;

Not make any changes or modifications to the electronic document other than the certification described in subsection (3) of this section; and

Confirm that the electronic document has been rendered tamper-evident.

If a certificate is completed with the information required by subsection (3) of this section and is attached to or made a part of a paper record, the certificate shall be considered conclusive evidence that the requirements of this section have been satisfied with respect to the record.

A record purporting to convey or encumber real property or any interest therein that has been recorded by a clerk for the jurisdiction in which the real property is located, although the record may not have been certified in accordance with the provisions of this section, shall import the same notice to third persons from the time of recording as if the record had been certified in accordance with the provisions of this section.

This section shall not apply to a plat, map, or survey of real property if under another law of this state, or under a rule, regulation, or ordinance applicable to a clerk:

There are requirements of format or medium for the execution, creation, or recording of the plat, map, or survey beyond the requirements applicable to a deed to real property; or

The plat, map, or survey must be recorded in a different location than a deed to real property.

State of [County] of I certify that the foregoing and annexed document entitled [document title], dated[document date, if applicable], and containing pages is a true and correct copy of an electronic document bearing one (1) or more electronic signatures. Executed this [date] [Signature of notary public] Stamp [ ] Notary Public [My commission expires: ] [My notary registration number is: ]

Click to view

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 34, effective January 1, 2020.

382.077.
Immediate recording — Priority of documents.

Documents physically presented to a county clerk for recording during regular business hours shall be considered for immediate recording if requested by the party presenting the documents, except that the county clerk may refuse unreasonable requests. Documents delivered by all other methods shall be processed as they are received, with priority assigned by the date the documents are received. All documents received on a given date shall have equal priority, and the county clerk shall have discretion to decide in what order documents are processed. A county clerk shall be held harmless for any disputes that arise regarding the timing of a recorded document.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 40, effective January 1, 2020.

382.080.
Recording of conveyance for longer than five years and of marriage agreement.

No deed conveying any title to or interest in real property, or lease of oil, gas, coal or mineral right and privilege, for a longer time than five (5) years, nor any agreement in consideration of marriage, shall be good against a purchaser for a valuable consideration without notice thereof, or any creditor, unless the deed is acknowledged by the party who executes it, or is proved and lodged for record in the proper office, as prescribed by law.

The provisions of this section shall apply with like protection to the creditor of, or innocent purchaser from, the heir or devisee of the grantor.

History.

494.

382.090.
Recording of options or offers to sell.

Any option or offer to sell real or other property, or any interest therein, when acknowledged or proven as deeds are required to be, may be recorded in the county in which the property is situated, in the same offices in which deeds are recorded, and in a separate book kept for that purpose, and the record of all such recorded options or offers to sell, shall, from the time of lodging them for record, be notice of such contracts to all persons.

History.

494a.

382.100.
Contracts for sale of real property may be recorded.

Any contract for the sale of real property or any interest therein, when acknowledged or proven as deeds are required to be, may be recorded in the county in which the property is situated, in the same offices and books in which deeds are recorded, and the record of any such contract recorded shall, from the time of lodging the contract for record, be notice of the contract to all persons.

History.

500.

382.110.
Recording of deeds and mortgages — Place of recording — Use of certified copies of original records — Contents of deed — Filing of deed in lieu of foreclosure — Time for filing deed.

All deeds, mortgages and other instruments required by law to be recorded to be effectual against purchasers without notice, or creditors, shall be recorded in the county clerk’s office of the county in which the property conveyed, or the greater part thereof, is located.

No county clerk or deputy county clerk shall admit to record any deed of conveyance of any interest in real property equal to or greater than a life estate, unless the deed plainly specifies and refers to the immediate source from which the grantor derived title to the property or the interest conveyed therein.

An authentic photocopy of any original record may be certified, as a true, complete, unaltered copy of the original record on file by the official public custodian of the record. A certified copy of a document certified by the official public custodian of that document may be submitted for filing in any other filing officer’s jurisdiction as though it were the original record. However, no county clerk or deputy county clerk shall accept for filing any original document or certified copy of any document unless the original document and its certified copy conforms to all statutory requirements for filing the document under KRS Chapter 382. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to a record generated and filed in Kentucky, and only if the certified copy thereof is to be utilized in Kentucky. If the record is a foreign record or a Kentucky record to be filed or utilized in a foreign jurisdiction, then this subsection shall not apply and applicable federal, Kentucky, or foreign law shall apply.

If the source of title is a deed or other recorded writing, the deed offered for record shall refer to the former deed or writing, and give the office, book and page where recorded, and the date thereof. If the property or interest therein is obtained by inheritance or in any other way than by recorded instrument of writing, the deed offered for record shall state clearly and accurately how and from whom the title thereto was obtained by the grantor.

If the title to the property or interest conveyed is obtained from two (2) or more sources, the deed offered for record shall plainly specify and refer to each of the sources in the manner provided in subsections (2) and (4), and shall show which part of the property, or interest therein, was obtained from each of the sources.

No grantor shall lodge for record, and no county clerk or deputy shall receive and permit to be lodged for record, any deed that does not comply with the provisions of this section.

No clerk or deputy clerk shall be liable to the fine imposed by subsection (1) of KRS

382.990

because of any erroneous or false references in any such deed, nor because of the omission of a reference required by law where it does not appear on the face of such deed that the title to the property or interest conveyed was obtained from more than one (1) source.

This section does not apply to deeds made by any court commissioner, sheriff or by any officer of court in pursuance of his duty as such officer, nor to any deed or instrument made and acknowledged before March 20, 1928. No deed shall be invalid because it is lodged contrary to the provisions of this section.

A mortgage holder shall file a deed in lieu of foreclosure in the county clerk’s office of the county in which the property conveyed, or the greater part thereof, is located, no later than forty-five (45) days after the date the deed in lieu of foreclosure is executed.

A deed filed pursuant to KRS

426.577

shall be filed by the grantee within five (5) business days of receipt of the deed from the commissioner appointed by a court to convey the property.

History.

Recodified 1942 Ky. Acts ch. 208, sec. 1, effective October 1, 1942, from Ky. Stat. sec. 495; 2005, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

382.120.
Real property acquired by descent — Requirements for conveyance of — Indexing — Clerk’s fees.

Before any deed to real property, the title to which has passed to the grantor under the laws of descent, is filed for record the grantor or grantee, or the agent or attorney or either, shall present to the county clerk the affidavit of the grantor or any one (1) of the heirs at law or next of kin of the ancestor of the grantor, or of two (2) residents of this state, each of whom has personal knowledge of the facts, which affidavit shall set forth:

The name of the ancestor;

The date of the ancestor’s death;

Whether the ancestor was married or single, and if married, the name of the surviving spouse and his or her address;

The place of residence at the time of the ancestor’s death, if known to the affiant or affiants;

The fact that the ancestor died intestate; and

The names, ages and addresses, so far as known or ascertainable, of each of such ancestor’s heir at law and next of kin, who by his death inherited such real property, and the relationship of each to the ancestor and the interest in such real property inherited by each.

The affidavit shall be filed with the clerk of the county in which the real property is situated, at or before the time when the deed or conveyance is filed with the clerk for record, and shall be recorded in the record of deeds, and indexed in the general index of deeds in the name of such ancestor as grantor, and in the name of each of such heirs at law or next of kin as grantees, in the same manner as if such names occurred in a deed of conveyance from the ancestor to the heirs at law. For indexing and recording the affidavit, the clerk shall receive the same fees as are allowed for recording and indexing deeds.

No county clerk or deputy clerk shall receive or permit to be lodged for record any such deed until the affidavit has been presented to him, but nothing in this section shall prevent the recording from being legal of any such deed lodged for record prior to the filing of the affidavit.

History.

495a-1, 495a-2: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

382.130.
When deeds executed in this state to be admitted to record.

Deeds executed in this state may be admitted to record:

On the acknowledgment, before the proper clerk, by the party making the deed;

By the proof of two (2) subscribing witnesses, or by the proof of one (1) subscribing witness, who also proves the attestation of the other;

By the proof of two (2) witnesses that the subscribing witnesses are both dead; and also like proof of the signature of one (1) of them and of the grantor;

By like proof that both of the subscribing witnesses are out of the state, or that one (1) is so absent and the other is dead; and also like proof of the signature of one (1) of the witnesses and of the grantor; or

On the certificate of a county clerk of this state, or any notary public, that the deed has been acknowledged before him by the party making the deed or proved before him in the manner required by subsection (2), (3) or (4).

History.

501.

382.135.
Statement of consideration or market value and mailing and in-care-of addresses required in deed to real property — Exceptions — Affidavit of personal representative — Clerk prohibited from filing noncompliant deed.

In addition to any other requirement imposed by law, a deed to real property shall contain the following:

The full name of the grantor and grantee;

The mailing addresses of the grantor and grantee;

A statement of the full consideration;

A statement indicating the in-care-of address to which the property tax bill for the year in which the property is transferred may be sent; and

In the case of a transfer other than by gift, or with nominal or no consideration a sworn, notarized certificate signed by the grantor or his or her agent and the grantee or his or her agent, or the parent or guardian of a person under eighteen (18) years old, that the consideration reflected in the deed is the full consideration paid for the property; or

In the case of a transfer either by gift or with nominal or no consideration, a sworn, notarized certificate signed by the grantor or his or her agent and the grantee or his or her agent, or the parent or guardian of a person under eighteen (18) years old, stating that the transfer is by gift and setting forth the estimated fair cash value of the property.

The deed filing requirements listed in subsection (1)(c), (d), and (e) of this section shall not apply to:

Deeds which only convey utility easements;

Deeds which transfer property through a court action pursuant to a divorce proceeding;

Deeds which convey rights-of-way that involve governmental agencies;

Deeds which convey cemetery lots;

Deeds which correct errors in previous deeds conveying the same property from the same grantor to the same grantee; or

Deeds which convey real property to a local airport board.

In the case of an exchange of properties, the fair cash value of the property being exchanged shall be stated in the body of the deed.

In the event of a transfer of property by will or under the laws of intestate succession, the personal representative of the estate, prior to closing out the estate, shall file an affidavit with the county clerk of each county in which any of the property is located, which shall contain the following:

The names and addresses of the persons receiving each property passing by will or intestate succession; and

The full or fair market value of each property as estimated or established for any purpose in the handling of the estate, or a statement that no such values were estimated or established.

No county clerk or deputy clerk shall lodge for record, and no county clerk or deputy shall receive and permit to be lodged for record, any deed that does not comply with the provisions of this section.

For purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the full name of the grantor and grantee shall be determined as follows:

As provided in KRS

355.9-503

(1); or

For a business entity, it shall be synonymous with its real name determined as provided in KRS 365.015(1)(b) and (c); or

For an individual, his or her surname and his or her first personal name or initial, middle personal name or names, or initial or initials, or any combination thereof that includes the individual’s surname.

The receipt for record and recording of any instrument by the county clerk not in compliance with this section shall not prevent the record of filing of the instrument from becoming notice as otherwise provided by law, nor impair the admissibility of the record as evidence.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 411, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 263, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2005, ch. 171, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 143, § 3, effective August 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 32, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 86, § 15, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 193, § 22, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

382.140.
Recording of deeds executed out of state. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

502; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

382.150.
Recording of deeds executed in foreign country.

Deeds not executed within the United States or any of its dependencies, may be admitted to record when certified, under his seal of office, by any foreign minister, officer in the consular service of the United States, secretary of legation of the United States, or by the secretary of foreign affairs or a notary public of the nation in which the acknowledgment is made, or by the judge or clerk of a superior court of the nation where the deed is executed, to have been acknowledged or proven before him in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

503.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Acknowledgment of instruments by commissioned officers of armed forces, KRS

384.080

.

382.160.
Certificate of acknowledgment or proof of deed.

Where the acknowledgment of a deed is taken by an officer of this state or by an officer residing out of this state, he may simply certify that it was acknowledged before him, and when it was done.

Where a deed is proved by persons other than the subscribing witnesses, the officer shall state the name and residence of each person in his certificate.

History.

504, 507.

382.170.
Recording of deeds executed according to laws of United States.

The requirements of this chapter as to the acknowledgment or proof of the execution of deeds, shall not apply to deeds made or executed under and in accordance with the laws of the United States. Such deeds, when executed, shall be entitled to be recorded in this state, and shall have the same force and effect as though they had been acknowledged or proved and recorded in accordance with the laws of this state.

History.

516.

382.180.
Instrument in foreign language — Recording of.

If a deed or power of attorney, written in any language other than the English, is produced to the proper recording officer, and offered for record, and if the person offering it produces a correct English translation thereof, to be filed in the office and recorded with the deed or power of attorney, the clerk shall record in the proper book both the original and copy.

History.

517.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Durable Power of Attorney, Form 269.06.

382.190.
Unrecorded deeds to be advertised by clerk. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

512; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

382.200.
Cross-index of conveyances — Filing and recording chattel mortgages, financing statements, and security agreements.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and KRS

382.077

, each county clerk shall make and keep an alphabetical cross-index of all conveyances recorded in his office, and when a mortgage or deed of trust, or any other conveyance, lease, or contract is lodged in his office for record, he shall, at once and before attending to any other business, place the names of the parties to the instrument upon the cross-index in his office, and shall within six (6) days thereafter record the instrument.

Chattel mortgages, financing statements or security agreements shall be filed and recorded in the manner set out in KRS

355.9-519

.

HISTORY:

513: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 1960; 2000, ch. 408, § 183, effective July 1, 2001; 2019 ch. 86, § 41, effective January 1, 2020.

382.205.
General cross indexes — Adoption and maintenance.

Any county where indexes to the records of deeds, mortgages, wills, marriages, or other public records have been or may hereafter be prepared by the Work Projects Administration or other appropriate agency of the United States government, or by order of the fiscal court of any county, such indexes or any of them may be adopted as the official general cross indexes of such records in the manner provided by this section in addition to each individual book index. Upon the completion of any such indexing project by an appropriate federal agency or by a person or persons acting under the authority of a fiscal court, or at any time thereafter, any citizen of the county may petition the county judge/executive to have said index adopted as the official index. Upon the filing of the petition, the county judge/executive may forthwith by appropriate order designate a licensed attorney practicing in the county who with the county attorney and county clerk shall comprise a commission to examine the index proposed to be adopted and ascertain whether the index is a complete and accurate index of the records to which it pertains. The commission shall thereupon make such examination as may be necessary to ascertain to its satisfaction whether such index is complete and accurate. Upon completion of such examination, the commission shall make a written report to the county judge/executive of the results thereof and of its recommendations, which report shall lie over for exceptions for sixty (60) days. Notice of the filing of said report shall be given by the clerk by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. Exceptions may be filed by any interested person, and if filed shall be heard and determined as in other cases. If no exceptions are filed thereto, or upon the exceptions (if any) the county judge/executive shall hear such proof as may be thought proper respecting the report filed by the clerk and the exceptions, and shall determine whether the said index is complete and accurate, and if it is determined that the index is complete and accurate, an order shall be entered adopting said index; provided, that if from such report or such proof it appears that corrections or additions should be made to such index in order to render it accurate and complete, the order may direct that such corrections or additions shall be made by the clerk, and in that event it shall be the duty of the clerk to make such corrections or additions forthwith, and upon his report that he has done so an order shall be entered adopting the index as so corrected. If adopted, said index shall thereupon become the official general cross index of the records to which it pertains, and all persons shall be entitled to rely thereon to the same extent as if the index had been prepared by the county clerk. Upon the adoption of any such index, it shall be the duty of the clerk to bring same up to date from the point at which same ceased to be made by the agency which prepared it, and to continue and maintain said index thereafter in lieu of the indexing system theretofore used, except he will continue to keep the regular individual book index, and to index all instruments lodged for record in conformity therewith. The indexes theretofore used shall not be destroyed after the adoption of the new indexes, but shall be safely kept by the clerk as other records are kept, subject to inspection by any person interested therein.

Expenses incurred by the county clerk under the provisions of this section shall be paid by the fiscal court of the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 1950, ch. 140; 1966, ch. 239, § 220; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 310, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 510, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A clerk may refuse to record a deed, affidavit of descent or any other instrument relating to real property where the tendered instrument is not accompanied by the proper recording fee; however, the clerk may not refuse to record a tendered instrument merely because it does not bear the proper group indexing number under this section; if the clerk refused to record an instrument because it wasn’t accompanied by the proper fee, the clerk would not be liable if in the interim another party filed an instrument which, because it was first recorded, gave that party a superior lien; if, on the other hand, the clerk’s refusal to record arises from the fact that the instrument does not bear the proper group index number, the injured party may have a cause of action against the clerk for damages sustained.

OAG 80-464

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Legal notices, KRS ch. 424.

382.210.
General index of real property records in courthouse districts — Contracts for indexing work.

In counties in which a courthouse district has been created and provisions made for appointment of commissioners in that district, the commissioners may direct that the clerk of such county shall, in such district, in addition to the alphabetical cross-index provided for in KRS

382.200

, have made in books prepared for that purpose, general indexes to the records of all the real property in the district by placing under the heads of the original surveyed sections or surveys, or parts of a section or survey, squares, subdivisions, or lots on the left page of such index book:

A plat showing the survey, or part of section thereof, subdivision, square, or lots indexed on the page;

The name of the grantor or grantors;

Next to the right the name of the grantee or grantees;

The number and page of the record where the instrument is found recorded;

The character of the instrument, to be followed by a pertinent description of the property conveyed by the deed, lease, or assignment of lease or other instrument of writing affecting the lot or land described; and

On the opposite page, in like manner, all the mortgages, liens or other encumbrances affecting such real estate.

The clerk of each county having a courthouse district shall, when so directed by the commissioners, prepare the proper specifications for an additional indexing system to bring up and complete the system to the date the new system is installed. He shall advertise for bids for the work under the specifications prepared and shall, with the approval of the commissioners, enter into a contract with the lowest and best bidder for the work. Before entering into contract with the successful bidder, the clerk shall require him to give bond for the faithful performance of the contract in a sum fixed by the commissioners and the bond shall be approved by the commissioners. The cost or expense of the work shall be paid by the commissioners out of the funds of the courthouse district.

When the general indexes are completed, they shall constitute the official indexes, and the clerk of the county shall keep them up by indexing therein all conveyances in the district within one (1) month from the time they are lodged for record, and when so indexed the alphabetical cross-index of such instruments need no longer be preserved. When such records or any part of them become defaced or injured, the clerk shall transcribe them into new books, which shall be as valid in law as the original record, and the transcript therefrom shall be received and taken as of the same force and effect. The cost of such transcription shall be paid for out of the funds of the courthouse district.

In courthouse districts in which additional sectional indexes have been prepared, the commissioners may employ a competent person to keep up the indexes, in order that such additional indexes may be kept correctly and accurately. The commissioners shall pay such person a salary of not over two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) per annum out of the funds of the courthouse district.

History.

513.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Records may be transcribed, when KRS

28.270

.

Transcribed records entitled to credit of original, KRS

28.290

.

382.220.
General index of real property records in counties containing urban-county government or city with population of 20,000 or more — Contracts for indexing work.

Except in counties having a courthouse district as provided in KRS

382.210

, the fiscal court in each county containing an urban-county government or a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census may in its discretion direct the county clerk to have made in books prepared for that purpose general indexes of the records of all the real property in the county according to a system approved by the fiscal court or the legislative body of the urban-county government. The county clerk shall advertise for bids for all the work necessary to install the system under specifications approved by the county judge/executive or mayor of the urban-county government and shall, with the approval of the fiscal court or the legislative body of the urban-county government, enter into a contract with the lowest and best bidder for the work, after requiring him to give bond for the faithful performance of the contract in a sum to be fixed by the fiscal court or the legislative body of the urban-county government and approved by the county judge/executive or mayor of the urban-county government, and when the work has been completed to its satisfaction, the fiscal court or the legislative body of the urban-county government shall direct the payment agreed upon out of the general fund of the county.

When general indexes are completed they shall constitute the official indexes and the clerk of the county shall keep the indexes up to date by indexing therein the records of all real property within one (1) month from the time they are lodged for record, and when so indexed the alphabetical cross-index of such instruments need no longer be preserved, and when such records or any part of them become defaced or injured the clerk shall transcribe the defaced or injured records into new books, which shall be as valid in law as the original record.

In order that such additional indexes may be kept correctly and accurately, the fiscal court or the legislative body of the urban-county government may employ a competent person to keep the system of indexing and shall pay such person a sum not less than two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) nor more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) per annum, out of the general funds of the county.

History.

1840c; amend. Acts 1950, ch. 17; 2014, ch. 92, § 307, effective January 1, 2015.

382.225.
Duties of county clerk as to general indexes in certain counties containing city with population of 20,000 or more.

The fiscal court in counties having a population of less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) and an assessed valuation of more than one hundred million (100,000,000) and containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census may in its discretion direct the county clerk to have made in books proper for that purpose general indexes of all records in the office of the county clerk according to a system approved by the fiscal court. When the general indexes are thus completed they shall constitute the official indexes and the clerk of the county shall keep the indexes up to date by indexing therein the records of all property within one (1) month from the date they are lodged for record, and when they are so indexed, the alphabetical cross-index of such instruments need no longer be preserved and when such records or any part of them become defaced or injured, the clerk shall transcribe the defaced or injured records into new books, and they shall be as valid in law as the original record. The fiscal court may in its discretion require the county clerk and his deputies to make such indexes as provided by this section without additional compensation or may allow the said clerk for his services rendered by him and his deputies reasonable compensation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 207, § 2; 2014, ch. 92, § 308, effective January 1, 2015.